Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.170

Seal.

The department shall have an official seal with the words "Department of Licensing of Washington" engraved thereon.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 4; 1965 c 156 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 334: See note following RCW 46.01.011.